Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 44.99.001.

[Renumbered as AS 28.90.040.]

Sec. 44.99.002.
Employment of radio stations.

The governor may employ one or more radio stations, located south of the Gulf of Alaska and suitable for distribution of news, executive proclamations and inquiries, information concerning the state, general information, and other matters suitable for broadcasting that the governor prescribes and that may be of service and benefit to the people to be served.

History.

(§ 5-1-7 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.080

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.99.003.
Qualifications of radio station.

A radio station used for the purposes set out in AS

44.99.002

shall

be licensed by the appropriate agency of the federal government to operate a broadcasting station of not less than 250 watt capacity in the state;

have operated radio broadcasting continuously for a least one year before the date of its employment by the governor and during this period have broadcast daily radio programs totaling at least 75 hours in each month;

have broadcast programs that have been received by the public over long wave radio receivers over a radius of at least 300 miles from the broadcasting station, and on demand shall furnish letters from the radio audience confirming reception within the required area;

have invested at least $20,000 in real estate, buildings, transmitters, power equipment, antenna, radio masts, musical instruments, office equipment and other property, used or useful in the operation of the radio station exclusively.

History.

(§ 5-1-8 ACLA 1949; am § 100 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.090

. Renumbered in 1980.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (3), deleted “or telegrams” following “shall furnish letters”.

Sec. 44.99.004.
Prescribing proof of capacity and suitability of station and of service and allotment of radio time.

The governor shall prescribe the proof required of the capacity and suitability of a station for broadcasting.
The governor may prescribe the service to be given, except that the state may, at its option, use not less than six hours of the station’s time on the air for each $100 paid for the service.
The total time to which the state is entitled shall be distributed over the period of one year.
Not more than one hour may be used in any one day and not more than one-fifty-second of the total time in any one week. The governor may yield portions of the governor’s allotted use of time to the University of Alaska or to state officials. A state official, except the governor, may not be allotted or use time within 30 days before a primary or general election.

History.

(§ 5-1-9 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.100

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.99.005.
Cost of radio service.

The cost of the radio service is a lawful charge against the state treasury if the owner or operator of the station files an affidavit that the station has during the period covered by payment complied with AS

44.99.002

—

44.99.005

and has furnished the service.

History.

(§ 5-1-10 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.170. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.99.006.
Agreement for an Alaska Maritime Academy.

The governor may enter into an agreement with the Federal Maritime Administration to provide for an Alaska Maritime Academy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 127 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.115

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.99.007.
Emergency transfer of seat of government.

When, due to an emergency resulting from the effects of enemy attack or an imminent enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of state government at the normal location of the state capital, the governor shall, as often as the exigencies of the situation require, declare by proclamation an emergency temporary location or locations for the seat of government at a place or places, inside or outside the state, that would not normally be considered military target sites and that the governor may consider advisable under the circumstances.
The governor shall take such action and issue such orders as may be necessary for an orderly transition to the emergency temporary location or locations.
The temporary location or locations shall remain the emergency seat of government until the emergency is declared to be ended by the governor and the seat of government is returned to its normal location.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.160. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.99.008.
Validity of official action.

During the time the seat of government remains at the emergency temporary location or locations, all official acts now or hereafter required by law to be performed at the seat of government by an officer, agency, department, or authority of the state, including the convening and meeting of the legislature in regular or special session, shall be valid and binding when performed at the emergency temporary location or locations as if performed at the permanent location of the seat of government.

History.

(§ 2 ch 48 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.170. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.99.009.
Governor as prime sponsor. [Repealed, § 42 ch 12 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 44.99.010.
Alaska Manpower Services Council. [Repealed, § 13 ch 43 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 44.99.020.
Use of paper.

A state agency shall use both sides of paper when feasible. In this section, “state agency” means a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, or other administrative unit of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government, including the University of Alaska, the Alaska Railroad Corporation, and legislative committees.

History.

(§ 7 ch 175 SLA 1990; am § 133 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 44.99.030.
Lobbying contracts prohibited.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the following entities may not contract with a person to pay the person money or other thing of value to lobby the state, a municipality of the state, or an agency of the state or municipality:

Alaska Aerospace Corporation;

Alaska Commercial Fishing and Agriculture Bank;

Alaska Energy Authority;

Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority;

Alaska Medical Facility Authority;

Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority;

Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority;

Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation;

Alaska Railroad Corporation;

[Repealed, § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004.]

Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute;

Alaska Student Loan Corporation.

In this section,

“lobby a municipality or an agency of a municipality” means to engage in an activity for the purpose of influencing municipal legislative or administrative action if the activity is substantially the same as activity that would have required registration under AS

24.45.121

if the activity was for the purpose of influencing state legislative or administrative action;

“lobby the state or an agency of the state” means to engage in an activity for which registration is required under AS

24.45.121

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 2 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Sec. 44.99.040.
Limitation on use of assets.

A state or municipal agency may not use or authorize the use of an asset to implement or aid in the implementation of a requirement of

an order of the President of the United States, a federal regulation, or a law enacted by the United States Congress that is applied to

infringe on a person’s right, under the Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, to keep and bear arms;

deny a person a right to due process, or a protection of due process, that would otherwise be available to the person under the Constitution of the State of Alaska or the Constitution of the United States; or

[Repealed, § 17 ch 8 SLA 2017.]

In this section,

“asset” means funds, facilities, equipment, services, or other resources of a state or municipal agency;

“state or municipal agency” means the University of Alaska, the Alaska Aerospace Corporation, the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority, the Alaska Energy Authority, the Alaska Railroad Corporation, or a department, institution, board, commission, division, council, committee, authority, public corporation, school district, regional educational attendance area, or other administrative unit of a municipality or of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government, and includes employees of those entities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 2013; am § 17 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective June 21, 2013, rewrote the section, which formerly applied only to funds related to implementation of the federal REAL ID Act of 2005.

The 2017 amendment, effective May 20, 2017, repealed (a)(2).